Udmurt.dic
Монья/d
абхаз/d
автобус/d
агитколлектив/d
адӟиськем/d
адыгейка/d
аздырон/d
азьбасьтон/d
азькӧчер/d
азьпалтэм/d
айшонан/d
аккумуляция/d
акыльтон/d
алдаськылон/d
алфавит/d
алятон/d
анайзы-атайзы/d
анемометр/d
антоновка/d
аракы-пӧзьтон/d
арена/d
арт/d
асгын/d
ас-утем/d
атлетика/d
ашык/d
бабушка/d
бадӟымлык/d
байка/d
бакчасион/d
баляпи/d
баобаб/d
барышаллян/d
батальон/d
баян/d
бекмылляськон/d
бельгийка/d
бергатӥськылон/d
берпум/dp
бесмен/d
биё/d
бинялтэм/d
бискыли/d
бичпоттон/d
бодьяос/d
большевик/d
борӟемчи/d
бӧдисьдон/d
бӧтьыртон/d
броневик/d
бугоу/d
будос/dp
буйгатскем/d
булгы/dp
бунӟектытон/d
буржуй/d
бусан/d
буфетчица/d
буяськись/d
быгыльтылон/d
быдэсмылон/d
бызьгыйыл/d
бырем/d
бытмон/d
бюро/d
вазелин/d
вайян/d
валатскылон/d
валсырчикпи/d
валэктонпус/d
вамыштылон/d
ваньбурлык/d
варкышно/d
васян/d
вачеяськылон/d
везъяськон/d
венгръёс/d
веран/dp
верттаськон/d
ветпункт/d
ви/d
визькыл/d
визьтэмъяськон/d
винтыяллян/d
висатъян/d
витиськон/d
вобла/d
вожаллян/d
вожмаллян/d
возет/d
возьматӥськон/d
волокита/d
воньдылон/d
вордэм/d
восьмытон/d
вӧлдэм/d
вӧсьмер/d
вредитель/d
вузкаронни/d
вуныл/d
вутскон/d
выжантӥ/d
вылсюй/dp
вырӟытӥськылон/d
галерея/d
гектограф/d
гермафродит/d
гизьыртылон/d
годь/d
гольдо/d
гордгуби/d
господство/d
грифель/d
гудыръяллян/d
гургетон/d
гууктон/d
гындали/d
давление/d
даулашем/d
демон/d
дизентерия/d
добровольность/d
допрос/d
дукъя/d
дуринтӥськылон/d
дыгомытон/d
дышетэмъяськон/d
егитан/d
етӥнан/d
ёрсатон/d
жальмылон/d
жильыртон/d
жулик/d
ӝимон/d
ӝомӟон/d
ӝуткаськылон/d
заборатон/d
замечание/d
защита/d
золатъян/d
зӧктала/d
зуркатэм/d
зырымӟон/d
ӟезиськылон/d
ӟиздон/d
ӟугырскытон/d
ӟустарияськем/d
идеолог/d
изогипса/d
инвалид/d
инсьӧрмуос/d
ирригация/d
ичиёмытон/d
йӧкур/d
йӧтылон/d
йылтылон/d
йыркураллян/d
йыршет/d
казёнка/d
калот/d
камфара/d
капкачи/d
карат/d
картина/d
катрадлык/d
кедра/d
кельтон/d
кенжытылон/d
керттон/d
кечылляськем/d
кизертон/d
кинжал/d
киросаськон/d
кисьмам/d
кларнет/d
когӟон/d
кокчатон/d
колпак/d
комната/d
конкурс/d
конюхан/d
коратон/d
корсиись/d
косяк/dp
коӵо/d
кӧл/d
кӧтвисён/d
кӧшкемам/d
кроккетон/d
куалектылон/d
куас/d
кубызлэн-йырыз/d
кузпалъяськем/d
куйма/dp
культивация/d
кунгырскон/d
курадӟон/d
курлам/d
курытомылон/d
кутскись/d
кушаськылон/d
кыдатӥськон/d
кыйгибы/d
кылиськон/d
кыль/d
кыныс/d
кырсьмылон/d
кыстӥськем/d
кышъет-пуръет/d
лайкан/d
лапкытъян/d
лезгинка/d
ленинизм/d
лёш/d
литература/d
лоншак/d
лӧскук/d
лулшуг/d
лыдбур/d
лыс/d
лэськан/d
люкон/d
мавзолей/d
майыг/d
мамыкӟон/d
масленча/d
маялляськон/d
мелодия/d
мертчытъян/d
миграция/d
миськиськылон/d
мозмытӥсь/d
моржпи/d
мувыж/d
мултэсмон/d
мускат/dp
мыжгаллян/d
мынон/d
мышкинтон/d
нальык/d
наськон/d
нейтрино/d
нёрет/d
нискыланни/d
носильщик/d
нуные/d
ныпъян/d
ньӧрбадь/d
нюлышъян/d
някыръян/d
обмотчица/d
огинтые/d
озон/d
омыртон/d
организм/d
осмотр/d
очеркист/d
ӧрекчаськись/d
паз/d
палдэт/d
палэсмурт/d
паразит/d
парторг/d
пауза/d
педсовет/d
пельтэм/pd
перепись/d
песьтэр/d
пидэс/d
пионер/d
питомник/d
плантация/d
повоска/d
подкомиссия/d
позор/d
полномочие/d
порни/d
пот/d
пӧр/d
пӧсятылон/d
препарат/d
проба/d
пропускник/d
пуан/d
пуклёк/d
пульӟылэм/d
пунылюгы/d
пуромытылон/d
пушмульыпу/d
пыдсатон/d
пыктэм/d
пырича/d
пышму/d
радист/d
раса/d
резиденция/d
решо/d
русификация/d
сайкатон/d
самбо/d
саптан/d
свай/d
селдь/d
серелӟон/d
сиг/d
сильпери/d
синтон/d
сисьмытон/d
скал-кузьыттурын/d
снаряд/d
состав/d
станица/d
суаськем/d
сукъяськон/d
суралтылон/d
сухари/d
сыскон/d
сэзьлык/d
сюл-ӝуш/d
сюты/pd
таган/d
талливай/d
ТАСС/d
тепыльӟылон/d
тӥгылян/d
тодматскылон/d
толъем/d
тӧдьыӟектэм/d
тӧлырос/d
трилогия/d
тугем/d
туйытон/d
тунась/d
туриж/d
тыбырскон/d
тыпыгуби/d
тытодос/d
тэргаськылон/d
тютёпи/d
удмуртка/d
узаллян/d
уйгырылон/d
уксёвозён/d
улос-вырос/d
умопу/d
урдсаллян/d
уродмон/d
усыкмытон/d
утчаськемъяськон/d
ушлон/d
ферма/d
фонема/d
халькопирит/d
хронометр/d
чабы/d
чакмарга/d
чарлан/d
челнок/d
черс/d
чибылай/d
чилибилиос/d
чирдон/d
чорыгась/d
чукинтэм/d
чупырга/d
чутэм/d
ӵабтӥськем/d
ӵенон/d
ӵошатскись/d
ӵужкенак/d
ӵуштым/dp
ӵынбус/d
шакта/d
шапыкъятылон/d
швабра/d
шепертытон/d
шина/d
шогол/d
шонеръятон/d
шӧдскон/d
шпулька/d
шугъятон/d
шулам/d
шундыберган/d
шутӥськон/d
шыльыкмон/d
шыръясь/d
ызьы/d
ыргон/dp
эбыльмон/d
экономика/d
электромагнит/d
эмиграция/d
эрекчаськем/d
эстетика/d
юалляськем/d
южман/d
юмыран/d
юрсираськон/d
явиськылон/d
янгышам/d
